California statutes. Public Resources Code
(2) No levy of any additional assessments pursuant to this section, including any levy of any assessment beyond the maximum time periods for which assessments are authorized pursuant to Section 5506.9, may be authorized unless a proposition, including the provisions specified in paragraphs (5), (8), and (9) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.9, is approved by a majority of the voters in the regional district voting on the proposition. Any future expenditure plan shall include a division of funds between capital outlay and maintenance and servicing, and a list of capital outlay projects and acquisition areas. No future expenditure plan shall contain any provision that could impair the payment of debt service on bonds or other evidence of indebtedness previously issued pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding any provision of
 the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972, any assessment levied pursuant to this section may include an annual amount to pay the costs of maintenance and servicing of the capital outlay projects funded pursuant to Section 5506.9, and may be collected in annual installments.

(e) Prior to the election required by subdivision (c), the Board of Supervisors of Los Angeles County may undertake proceedings on behalf of the proposed regional district in accordance with Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code to create an assessment district with the same boundaries as the proposed regional district. Hearings required pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code may be consolidated with those required pursuant to this division. Those proceedings shall be deemed to be the proceedings required by Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the
 Streets and Highways Code. 

(f) The governing body may exempt from the assessment any uninhabited parcel substantially used in agriculture and any parcel enforceably restricted as open-space land during the time in which the parcel is so used or restricted, if the governing body determines that these parcels will not benefit from the expenditure of the proceeds of assessments. 

(g) The formation of a regional district with boundaries coterminous with those of Los Angeles County is not subject to Section 5517.1 or to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision in the acts specified in Section 5539.5 and in subdivision (a), the net amount to be assessed upon lands within an
 assessment district may be apportioned by any formula or method that fairly distributes the net amount among all assessable lots or parcels in proportion to the estimated benefits to be received by each lot or parcel from the improvements.

(i) Analysis and review of the measure submitted to the voters pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be carried out pursuant to Section 9160 of the Elections Code.

(j) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the land acquisition, improvements, and services provided by the regional district, if created and established, will specially benefit the properties assessed and the persons paying the assessments authorized in this section in at least the following respects:

(1) Enhanced recreational opportunities and expanded access to recreational facilities for all residents throughout
 the district. 

(2) Improved quality of life for all communities in the district by protecting, restoring, and improving the district’s irreplaceable beach, wildlife, park, and open-space land.

(3) Preservation of mountains, foothills, and canyons, and development of public access to these lands throughout the district.

(4) Protection of historical and cultural assets of the region. 

(5) Increased economic activity and expanded employment opportunities within the regional district. 

(6) Increased property values, resulting from the effects specified in this subdivision. 

(7) Provision of benefits to all properties within the
 county, including positive impacts on air and water quality, capacity of roads, transportation and other public infrastructure systems, schools, and public utilities. 

(k) The Legislature also finds and declares the following:

(1) The expansion, restoration, and improvement of park, recreation, beach, and open-space lands throughout Los Angeles County benefits all residents in the county.

(2) Protection, restoration, and improvement of these lands are vital to the quality of life for all residents in Los Angeles County. 

(3) Increased park and recreation opportunities in the densely populated and heavily urbanized areas of Los Angeles County are vital to the health and well-being of all residents in the county, and providing these opportunities is a
 high priority. 

(4) The protection and enhancement of the recreational opportunities provided by Los Angeles County’s beaches, shoreline, and mountains must be included within the expenditure plan specified in subdivision (c) of Section 5506.9 in order to provide benefits to each resident of the county. The Legislature also finds and declares that, consistent with Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000), the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy is a unique and valuable environmental, educational, and recreational resource; that as the last large undeveloped area within the greater Los Angeles metropolitan region it provides essential relief from the urban environment; and that the preservation and protection of this resource is in the public interest; and the Legislature further finds and declares that the acquisition of open-space lands by the conservancy provides a necessary benefit to each and every resident of Los Angeles County.

(5) The population of Los Angeles County continues to grow at an increasing rate, and already is far behind other urban areas in the state in providing adequate park, recreation, and open-space facilities for its residents. Creation of a regional park and open-space district with boundaries coterminous with those of Los Angeles County is critical to help address the growing and unmet park and recreation needs in Los Angeles County. It is therefore vital that Los Angeles County act immediately to address these issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5539.10.

(a)(1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the land acquisition, improvements, and services provided by the regional district formed pursuant to Section 5506.10 will specifically benefit the properties assessed and the persons paying the assessments authorized in this section in at least the following respects:

(A) Enhanced recreational opportunities and expanded access to recreational facilities for all residents throughout the regional district.

(B) Improved quality of life for all communities in the regional district by protecting, restoring, and improving the regional district’s irreplaceable beaches, rivers and creeks, wildlife, parks, and open-space land.

(C) Preservation of natural lands, including foothills, and rivers and creeks, and the development of public access to those lands and waters throughout the regional district.

(D) Protection of the historical and cultural values of the territory of the regional district.

(E) Increased economic activity and expanded employment opportunities within the regional district.

(F) Increased property values, resulting from the benefits specified in this subdivision.

(G) Provision of benefits to all properties within the regional district, including positive impacts on air and water quality, capacity of roads, transportation and other public infrastructure systems, schools, and public utilities.

(2) The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The expansion, restoration, improvement, and safety of park, recreational, beach, and open-space lands throughout the regional district benefits all residents in the regional district.

(B) Protection, restoration, and improvement of the lands within the regional district are vital to the quality of life for all residents in the regional district.

(C) Maintaining, improving, and servicing, and
 providing security for, park, recreational, and open-space lands and improvements is vital to the welfare and to the property values of all residents in the regional district.

(D) Increased park and recreational opportunities in the more densely populated and urbanized areas of the regional district are particularly vital to the health and well-being of residents, and providing those opportunities is a high priority.

(E) The protection and enhancement of the recreational opportunities provided by the rivers, beaches, foothills, parkways, greenways, and other open-space areas in the regional district must be included within the expenditure plan specified in paragraph (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.10 in order to provide benefits to each resident of the county.

(F) Portions of parcels of land that are in
 commercial agricultural use do not benefit from park or open-space lands, facilities, or services funded pursuant to this section.

(b) In addition to the authority conferred in Section 5539.5, to the extent not inconsistent with this section, all provisions of the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972 (Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code) are applicable to the regional district, except as follows:

(1) Article 2 (commencing with Section 22605) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code does not apply.

(2) No changes shall be made pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 22620) of Part 2 of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code or Section 5572 of this code with respect to the rate and method of apportionment of assessments, the
 use of proceeds of assessments, the use of proceeds of bonds, and the territory included within the district, except that the governing body may correct errors in assessments, rule on appeals of assessments against particular parcels, and annually adjust the assessments levied against particular parcels of real property to reflect changes in the uses of those parcels.

(3) No changes shall be made to the rate and method of apportionment of any assessment approved by the voters and levied pursuant to this section.

(4) In addition to the items required by Section 22567 of the Streets and Highways Code, the regional district’s annual report shall include all of the following:

(A) Changes in the total number of parcels assessed and changes in the number of parcels with respect to use code.

(B) The amount of revenue expected to be received by the regional district in the next fiscal year.

(C) The proposed allocation of funds for operation and maintenance for the next fiscal year.

(D) The expenditure of funds in the current fiscal year.

(5) Any notice required pursuant to the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972, Section 54954.6 of the Government Code, or Section 5511 shall be published pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code.

(6) (A) (i) The governing body shall not levy any assessment unless a proposition authorizing the regional district to levy the assessment is first approved by a majority of the voters voting on the
 proposition. The proposition shall include the matters specified in subdivision (c) of Section 5506.10, except for paragraph (6) of that subdivision. The election held pursuant to this paragraph shall satisfy the requirement for any election that may be required under Section 22525.5 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(ii) No additional assessment shall be levied pursuant to this section, including any assessment for time periods beyond those specified in paragraphs (7) and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.10, unless a proposition, including the matters specified in subdivision (c) of Section 5506.10, except for paragraph (6) of that subdivision, is approved by a majority of the voters in the regional district voting on the proposition.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 5518, the County Counsel of the County of Sacramento shall prepare the language in the ballot label.

(C) The Board of Supervisors of Sacramento County may consolidate a proposition submitted to the voters pursuant to this paragraph into a single ballot measure with the proposition whether to form the regional district submitted pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.10.

(7) (A) All proceeds of assessments levied or bonds issued by the regional district shall be allocated in accordance with paragraphs (5) and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.10.

(B) Any future expenditure plan shall include a division of funds between expenditures for capital outlay projects and expenditures for operation and maintenance, a list of proposed capital outlay projects, and a description of areas proposed for acquisition. No expenditure plan shall contain any provision that may impair the
 payment of debt service on bonds or other evidence of indebtedness previously issued pursuant to this section. Any assessment levied pursuant to this section may include an annual amount to pay the costs of operation and maintenance and may be collected in annual installments.

(c) Prior to the election required by paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), the Board of Supervisors of Sacramento County may undertake proceedings on behalf of the proposed regional district in accordance with Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code to create an assessment district with the same boundaries as the proposed regional district. Hearings required pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code may be consolidated with those required pursuant to this article. Those proceedings shall be deemed to be the proceedings required by Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of
 Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(d) (1) The governing body shall exempt from assessment any uninhabited parcel that is substantially used in agriculture and any parcel enforceably restricted as open-space land during the time that the parcel is so used or restricted, if the governing body determines that the parcel will not benefit from the expenditure of the proceeds of assessments.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, lands that are enforceably restricted as open-space lands include, but are not limited to, lands restricted under contract pursuant to the Williamson Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code) and lands restricted pursuant to a conservation easement.

(e) The net amount to be assessed upon lands within
 an assessment district may be apportioned by any formula or method which fairly distributes the net amount among all assessable lots or parcels in proportion to the estimated benefits to be received by each lot or parcel from the improvements.

(f) The regional district shall not levy assessments beyond the last maturity date of any bonds issued pursuant to Section 5539.10 nor longer than 30 years from the date on which the assessment is first levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1071, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5540.

(a) A district may take by grant, appropriation, purchase, gift, devise, condemnation, or lease, and may hold, use, enjoy, and lease or dispose of real and personal property of every kind, and rights in real and personal property, within or without the district, necessary to the full exercise of its powers.

(b) Lands subject to the grant of an open-space easement executed and accepted by the district in accordance with this article are enforceably restricted within the meaning of Section 8 of Article XIII of the California Constitution. An easement or other interest in real property may be dedicated for park or open-space purposes, or both, by the adoption of a resolution by the board of directors,
 and any interest so dedicated may be conveyed only as provided in this section.

 (c) A district shall not validly convey any interest in any real property actually dedicated and used for park or open-space purposes, or both, without the consent of a majority of the voters of the district voting at a special election called by the board and held for that purpose. Consent does not need to be obtained for a lease of any real property for a period not exceeding 50 years; and consent does not need to be obtained for a conveyance of any real property if the Legislature, by concurrent resolution, authorizes a conveyance after a resolution of intention has been adopted by at least a two-thirds vote of the board of directors of the district, specifically describing the property to be conveyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 166, Sec. 3.   (AB 769)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5540.1.

Notwithstanding Section 5540, the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District shall not exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire any real property or any interest in real property in the San Mateo County Coastal Annexation Area, as defined in the Resolution of Application for Annexation Proceedings No. 03-20, which was adopted by the Board of Directors of the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District on June 6, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 27, first Sec. 2.   Effective April 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5540.2.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) The sale of private watershed lands owned by the water company in the Upper Guadalupe watershed, including the Los Gatos Creek and Saratoga Creek watersheds, to the district offers an abundance of benefits to the public and wildlife.

(2) The transfer of these lands will ensure that several significant land conservation priorities will be addressed through active land management by the district.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “District” means the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space
 District.

(2) “Water company” means the San Jose Water Company.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the water company may sell lands in the Upper Guadalupe watershed, including the Los Gatos Creek and Saratoga Creek watersheds, to the district in accordance with the following conditions:

(1) The district shall commit to improve open-space trail connectivity, encourage forest management practices to promote late seral or old-growth habitat conditions, maintain wildland fire safety, preserve open space, and protect the downstream beneficial uses of water, including, but not limited to, critical elements of the public drinking water supply, in perpetuity.

(2) The water company shall retain all its existing water rights and a necessary fee title or easement
 interest, in perpetuity, to make certain that the customers of the water company have access to safe and reliable drinking water. The fee title or easement interest shall include all facilities owned and operated by the water company, including, but not limited to, treatment plants, delivery systems, reservoirs, and main tributaries.

(d) (1) If a sale of land occurs pursuant to this section, the water company shall invest the net proceeds, if any, from the sale in water system infrastructure, plant, facilities, and properties that are necessary or useful in the performance of the water company’s duties to the public.

(2) For the purposes of tracking the net proceeds and their investment, the water company shall maintain records necessary to document the investment of the net proceeds pursuant to this section.

(3) All water utility infrastructure, plant, facilities, and properties constructed or acquired by, and used and useful to, the water company by investment pursuant to this section shall be included among the water company’s other utility property upon which the Public Utilities Commission authorizes the water company the opportunity to earn a reasonable rate of return.

(4) This subdivision shall apply to the investment of the net proceeds from the sale of land pursuant to this section for a period of eight consecutive calendar years beginning with the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the water company receives the net proceeds. The balance of any net proceeds and interest on the proceeds that is not invested after the eight-year period shall be allocated solely to the water company ratepayers.

(5) The Public Utilities Commission retains continuing authority to determine the used, useful, or necessary status of any and all infrastructure improvements and investments by the water company.

(e) Section 851 of the Public Utilities Code shall not apply to the transfer of lands pursuant to this section.

(f) The authority for the water company to sell lands to the district pursuant to subdivision (c) is inoperative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   (SB 492)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5540.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5540, a district, with the approval by a two-thirds vote of the members of its board of directors, may exchange real property or an interest in real property dedicated and used for park or open-space purposes, or both park and open-space purposes, for real property or an interest in real property that the board of directors determines to be of equal or greater value and necessary to be acquired for park or open-space purposes, or both park and open-space purposes.

(b) If a proposed exchange of real property or an interest in real property pursuant to subdivision (a) is not feasible due to inability to identify a compatible or comparable exchange on an equal or greater
 value basis or for park or open-space purposes under subdivision (a), the East Bay Regional Park District may accept monetary compensation concluded by a highest and best market value determined and documented by a certified, licensed appraiser. The acceptance of monetary compensation under this subdivision is only permissible when the real property or interest in real property exchange is with another public agency. Monetary compensation accepted pursuant to this subdivision shall be used to purchase real property or an interest in real property for park and open-space purposes.

(c) A district shall not in a calendar year exchange more than 10 acres of district-owned real property or an interest in real property pursuant to this section for other real property or an interest in real property, and the real property or interest in real property
 acquired by the district shall be adjacent to other real property owned by the district.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the East Bay Regional Park District, the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District, and the Sonoma County Agricultural Preservation and Open Space District may exchange up to a maximum of 80 acres of district-owned real property or an interest in real property in a calendar year pursuant to this section for other real property or an interest in real property, and real property or an interest in real property acquired pursuant to this section by the district shall be adjacent to other real property owned by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 166, Sec. 4.   (AB 769)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5540.6.

Notwithstanding Section 5540, a district may, with the approval by a four-fifths vote of the board of directors, convey to another public agency any real property, or any interest in real property, dedicated and used for park or open-space purposes, or both, provided the public agency undertakes in a recorded written agreement to continue to use the real property, or the interest in the real property, for those purposes and not to convey the real property, or the interest in the real property, without the consent of a majority of the voters of the district at an
 election called and conducted by the board pursuant to Section 5540.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 23, Sec. 2.   Effective April 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5541.

A district may plan, adopt, lay out, plant, develop, and otherwise improve, extend, control, operate, and maintain a system of public parks, playgrounds, golf courses, beaches, trails, natural areas, ecological and open space preserves, parkways, scenic drives, boulevards, and other facilities for public recreation, for the use and enjoyment of all the inhabitants of the district, and it may select, designate, and acquire land, or rights in land, within or without the district, to be used and appropriated for such purposes. It may cause such trails, parkways, scenic drives, and boulevards to be opened, altered, widened, extended, graded or regraded, paved or repaved, planted
 or replanted, repaired, and otherwise improved, may conduct programs and classes in outdoor science education and conservation education, and may do all other things necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this article.

The board of directors of a district shall not interfere with control of any of the foregoing or other public property, that are existing, owned or controlled by a municipality or county in the district, except with the consent of the governing body of the municipality, or of the county if the same is in unincorporated territory, and upon such terms as may be mutually agreed upon between the board of directors of the district and the governing body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 857.)
-------------------------------------------

5541.1.

The East Bay Regional Park District may plan, adopt, lay out, plant, develop, and otherwise improve, extend, control, operate, and maintain vehicular recreational areas and trails for the use and enjoyment of all the inhabitants of the district, and it may select, designate, and acquire land, or rights in land, within or without the district, to be used and appropriated for such purposes. The East Bay Regional Park District may cause such vehicular recreational areas and trails to be opened, altered, widened, extended, graded or regraded, paved or repaved, planted or replanted, repaired, and otherwise improved.

The Board of Directors
 of the East Bay Regional Park District shall not interfere with the control of any vehicular recreational area or trail that is existing, owned, or controlled by a municipality or county in the district, except with the consent of the governing body of the municipality, or of the county if the same is in unincorporated territory, and upon such terms as may be mutually agreed upon between the board of directors of the district and the governing body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 288.)
-------------------------------------------

5541.2.

The Riverside County Regional Park and Open-Space District may plan, acquire, preserve, protect, and otherwise improve, extend, control, operate, and maintain open-space areas, greenbelt areas, wildlife habitat areas, and regional parks for the use and enjoyment of all the inhabitants of the district. The district may select, designate, and acquire land, or rights in land, within or without the district, to be used and appropriated for those purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 25.7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5541.3.

The district may develop, improve, operate, and maintain the real property conveyed pursuant to Section 5003.12 as a part of the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District trail system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 374, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5542.

A district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to accomplish the purposes of this article.

A district may not acquire by condemnation any of the lands, properties, or facilities of any municipal utility district which are appropriated to public use or are used in or are useful to the operations of the municipal utility district or which are within the watershed of any stream or reservoir which supplies water for domestic use or which the directors of the municipal utility district determine by resolution to be properties which are required for the purposes of the municipal utility
 district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

5542.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and except as provided in subdivision (b), when property, whether owned in fee or lesser title interest, leased, or operated under a license, management agreement, or otherwise, is appropriated or otherwise acquired for public use as a regional park or regional open space or both operated by a district, there is a rebuttable presumption of its having been appropriated or otherwise acquired for the best and most necessary public use. The presumption established by this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(b) When such property is sought to be acquired for city or county road, street, or highway purposes, and such property was dedicated to or established for park, recreational, or open-space purposes prior to the initiation of road, street, or highway route location studies, an action for declaratory relief may be brought by the district in the superior court to determine the question of which public use is the best and most necessary public use for such property. Such action for declaratory relief shall be filed and served within 120 days after publication by the city or county, as the case may be, in a newspaper of general circulation pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, and delivery of a written notice to the district by the city or county that a proposed route or site or an adopted route includes such property. Such action for declaratory relief shall have preference over all other civil actions in the matter of setting the same for hearing or trial to the end that any such action
 shall be quickly heard and determined. If an action for declaratory relief is not filed and served within such 120-day period, the right to bring such action is waived and the provisions of subdivision (a) shall not apply. When a declaratory relief action with respect to such property being sought for city or county road, street, or highway purposes may not be brought pursuant to this section, the provisions of subdivision (a) shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5543.

A district may make contracts, employ labor, and do all acts necessary for the full exercise of its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5544.

A district may borrow money, incur indebtedness, and issue bonds or other evidences of such indebtedness, but it shall not incur any funded indebtedness except in accordance with the provisions of section 5568 of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5544.1.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the board may borrow money by the issuance of promissory notes or other evidences of indebtedness in an amount, or of a value, not exceeding, in the aggregate at any one time, the greater of 5 percent of the total of the district’s general fund and development fund budgets for the year in which the loan is made, or the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), to be used for any revenue-producing purpose for which the district may expend funds.

A district shall not exercise the borrowing authority conferred by this section if the district, at any time
 during the previous two years, has not met the loan repayment requirements of this section and the repayment provisions set forth in the promissory note or other evidence of indebtedness issued for a loan entered into pursuant to this section. A district shall not expend, in any one year, any amount of money in excess of what it collects in property taxes, state and federal subventions, grants, loans, fees, gifts, bequests, or income from other sources.

Indebtedness incurred pursuant to this section shall be repaid during a period not to exceed five years from June 30th of the fiscal year in which it is incurred and shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding 10 percent per annum, or the rate allowed under Section 53531 of the Government Code, if higher, payable annually or semiannually or in part annually and in part semiannually.

Each indebtedness incurred under this section shall be authorized by a resolution of the
 board unanimously adopted, shall be evidenced by a promissory note or contract signed by the president of the board and attested by the secretary or treasurer, and shall be sold at not less than 95 percent of the principal amount in the manner determined by the board at a discount which equals the underwriter’s spread. The board shall determine that the discount reflects an underwriter’s spread which is both reasonable and customary under the prevailing market conditions. One of the two signatures may be by facsimile reproduction.

The indebtedness authorized to be incurred by this section shall be in addition to, and the provisions of this section shall not apply to, any bonded indebtedness authorized by vote of the electors.

Nothing in this section limits or restricts the authority of the district to issue promissory notes or deeds of trust in the acquisition of real property or the exercise of its right of eminent domain
 subject to the limitations in Section 5568.

Nothing in this section limits the authority of the district to borrow pursuant to Section 5544.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 371, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5544.2.

(a) A district may acquire all necessary and proper lands and facilities, or any portion thereof, by means of a plan to borrow money or by purchase on contract.

(b) The amount of indebtedness to be incurred shall not exceed an amount equal to the anticipated property tax revenue allocations for the next five-year period derived pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or the anticipated tax income derived pursuant to Section 50077 of the Government Code, or both. The time period to repay the indebtedness shall not exceed the applicable time period provided in subdivision (c) or (d).

(c) All indebtedness that is incurred on or after July 1, 1982, pursuant to this section shall be repaid during a period not to exceed 20 years from the date on which it is incurred and shall bear interest at the rate allowed pursuant to Section 53531 of the Government Code, payable annually or semiannually or in part annually and in part semiannually. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, with respect to the East Bay Regional Park District only, all indebtedness incurred pursuant to this section for acquisition of lands and facilities designated in the district’s master plan, including the Chabot Ridgelands, shall be repaid during a period not to exceed 30 years and at a rate not exceeding the rate allowed in this section for other districts. All other acquisitions of land and facilities by the East Bay Regional Park District not designated in the master plan are subject to the 20-year repayment period limitation of this
 section.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), all indebtedness that is incurred by the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District, on or after January 1, 2012, pursuant to this section, shall be repaid during a period not to exceed 30 years from the date on which it is incurred and shall bear interest at the rate allowed pursuant to Section 53531 of the Government Code, payable annually or semiannually or in part annually and in part semiannually.

(e) Each indebtedness shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by the affirmative votes of at least two-thirds of the members of the district board, shall be evidenced by a promissory note or contract signed by the president of the board and attested by the secretary
 or treasurer, and shall be sold at not less than 95 percent of the principal amount in the manner determined by the board at a discount that equals the underwriter’s spread. The board shall determine that the discount reflects an underwriter’s spread that is both reasonable and customary under the prevailing market conditions. One of the two signatures may be by facsimile reproduction. At the time of making the general tax levy after incurring each indebtedness and annually thereafter until the indebtedness is paid or until there is a sum in the treasury set apart for that purpose sufficient to meet all payments of principal and interest on the indebtedness as they become due, a portion of the taxes levied and collected pursuant to Section 50077 of the Government Code, if any, shall be levied and collected and set aside sufficient to pay the interest on the indebtedness and the part of the principal that will become due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available.

(f) For indebtedness incurred pursuant to subdivision (d), the resolution by the district board required pursuant to subdivision (e) shall specify the revenue pledged by the district to repay the indebtedness. The resolution shall recite in substance that the principal of, and interest on, the indebtedness are payable solely from the revenue pledged to repay the indebtedness and that the district is not obligated to pay the principal or interest except from the pledged revenue, and may provide for the same pledge to all other indebtedness incurred pursuant to this section, including indebtedness incurred prior to January 1, 2012, in order to maintain a parity relationship among all outstanding indebtedness incurred by the district pursuant to this section.

 (g) The indebtedness authorized to be incurred by this section shall be in addition to, and this section shall not apply to, any bonded indebtedness authorized by vote of the electors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 104, Sec. 1.   (AB 612)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5544.3.

The district may, pursuant to Section 5544, borrow not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to cover operating expenses between the time of formation of the district and the first receipt of revenue under Section 5545.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

5545.

It may levy and collect, or cause to be levied and collected, taxes to carry out any of its objects or purposes and to pay the obligations of the district. Taxes levied for any one fiscal year shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed value of all real and personal property within the district. Any tax provided for in this section shall be exclusive of any tax levied to meet the bonded indebtedness of the district and the interest thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 642.)
-------------------------------------------

5545.1.

The board may submit a proposition to the electors of the district for an increase in the maximum rate of tax specified by Section 5545. The election shall be called and held in the same manner as a bond election, and approval by a majority of all votes cast shall be required to authorize such an increase.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 857.)
-------------------------------------------

5545.3.
